Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1126.
do enact as follows:AB1126,13Section 1. 118.07 (7) of the statutes is created to read:AB1126,1,44118.07 (7) (a) In this subsection:AB1126,2,651. “Electronic smoking device” means a device that may be used to deliver any 1aerosolized or vaporized liquid or other substance for inhalation, regardless of 2whether the liquid or other substance contains nicotine, including an e-cigarette, e-3cigar, e-pipe, vape pen, or e-hookah. “Electronic smoking device” does not include 4drugs, devices, or combination products authorized for sale by the U.S. food and 5drug administration, as those terms are defined in the federal Food, Drug, and 6Cosmetic Act.AB1126,2,772. “School premises” means all of the following:AB1126,2,108a. Real property owned or rented by, or under the control of, a school board, 9including playgrounds, athletic facilities or fields, and any other property that is 10occupied by pupils on a regular basis.AB1126,2,1411b. Real property owned or rented by an operator or governing board of a 12charter school that is used for the operation of a charter school, including 13playgrounds, athletic facilities or fields, and any other property that is occupied on 14a regular basis by pupils attending the charter school.AB1126,2,1815c. Real property owned or rented by the governing body of a private school that 16is used for the operation of a private school, including playgrounds, athletic 17facilities or fields, and any other property that is occupied on a regular basis by 18pupils attending the private school.AB1126,2,19193. “Vape” means to inhale or exhale vapor from an electronic smoking device.AB1126,2,2020(b) No individual may vape on school premises.AB1126,3,421(c) Nothing in this subsection prohibits a school board, the operator of a 22charter school, or the governing body of a private school from adopting a policy 23relating to electronic smoking devices on school premises that is more restrictive 1than the prohibition under par. (b), and nothing in this subsection prohibits a 2political subdivision, as defined in s. 16.99 (3d), from enacting an ordinance relating 3to electronic smoking devices on school premises that is more restrictive than the 4prohibition under par. (b).AB1126,3,55